Montana, session 2025, LC0903.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 13-37-502, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-37-502. Prohibition on foreign national interference in election. (1) It is unlawful for a foreign
national, directly or through an intermediary, to make a disbursement for an electioneering communication, a
contribution, or an expenditure, or to make an express or implied promise to make a contribution or an
expenditure, in connection with any candidate election or statewide ballot issue as defined in 13-27-110.
(2) It is unlawful for a person to solicit, accept, or receive a contribution, expenditure, or
disbursement described in subsection (1) from a foreign national.
(3) To the extent that a potential violation of this section also violates 52 U.S.C. 30121 or 11 CFR
110.20, investigation and enforcement of the matter must be referred to the federal election commission. The
commissioner or a county attorney may not bring an enforcement action regarding the portion of the matter that
also violates 52 U.S.C. 30121 or 11 CFR 110.20."
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****